Utah statutes.
39-8-101.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Active duty" means that a servicemember is activated and deployed outside the state pursuant to federal orders under Title 10 or Title 32, United States Code.

(2)  "Servicemember" means a resident of this state who is a member of the Utah National Guard or a reserve component of the United States Armed Forces in this state.



Enacted by Chapter 333, 2006 General Session

